Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1111.04
Department of Administrative Services; Accounting Administrator; administratively establish funds.

(1) The Accounting Administrator may administratively establish cash and revolving funds to (a) account for gifts, bequests, or devises when no cash fund exists and (b) account for specific, one-time, nonfederal sources of revenue.

(2) All cash or revolving funds administratively created by the Accounting Administrator shall exist for a maximum of two fiscal years after the date of establishment. Prior to the end of two fiscal years, the expending agency shall notify the Accounting Administrator of its intentions to (a) lapse the balance of the administrative cash or revolving fund to the General Fund or (b) permanently establish the fund in statute.

(3) In addition, the Accounting Administrator may administratively establish federal funds, trust funds, and distributive funds as necessary.

Laws 1994, LB 1194, § 7.